FST/Tur/tur_nouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+N %+SG %+PL %+PSS2P %+PSS1P %+PSS2S %+PSS3S %+NOM %+DAT %+LOC %+GEN %+ACC %+ABL

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Ninf

%+N%+SG%+NOM:0       #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM:^lar    #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT:^ye     #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT:^lere   #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC:^de     #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC:^lerde  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN:^un     #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN:^lerin  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC:^i      #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC:^leri   #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL:^den    #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL:^lerden #;
%+N%+SG%+NOM%+PSS1P:^miz #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM%+PSS1P:^lerimiz  #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT%+PSS1P:^mize  #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT%+PSS1P:^lerimize  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN%+PSS1P:^ümüzün  #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN%+PSS1P:^lerimizin  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC%+PSS1P:^ümüzü  #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC%+PSS1P:^lerimizi  #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL%+PSS1P:^ümüzden   #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL%+PSS1P:^mızdan  #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC%+PSS1P:^ümüzde   #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC%+PSS1P:^lerimizde #;
%+N%+SG%+NOM%+PSS2P:^niz  #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM%+PSS2P:^leriniz  #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT%+PSS2P:^ünüze  #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT%+PSS2P:^o  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC%+PSS2P:^ünüzü  #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC%+PSS2P:^z  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN%+PSS2P:^ünüzün  #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN%+PSS2P:^q  #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL%+PSS2P:^ünüzden  #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL%+PSS2P:^w  #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC%+PSS2P:^ünüzde  #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC%+PSS2P:^x   #;
%+N%+SG%+NOM%+PSS2S:^ün  #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM%+PSS2S:^rın #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT%+PSS2S:^m  #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT%+PSS2S:^lerine  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN%+PSS2S:^n  #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN%+PSS2S:^l  #;

LEXICON Noun
kale	Ninf;
dilsizlik	Ninf;
cezeriye	Ninf;
bölge	Ninf;
hırsız	Ninf;
nöron	Ninf;
sınıf	Ninf;
aygıtçık	Ninf;
bohça	Ninf;
atom	Ninf;
seri% katil	Ninf;
model	Ninf;
çöl	Ninf;
hacı	Ninf;
ipek	Ninf;
Kürt	Ninf;
dolmuş	Ninf;
tek% sayı	Ninf;
makara	Ninf;
teklif	Ninf;
elektrikli% sandalye	Ninf;
gazel	Ninf;
çığlık	Ninf;
kazma	Ninf;
sakin	Ninf;
yanak	Ninf;
disket	Ninf;
erime	Ninf;
di	Ninf;
kıskançlık	Ninf;
aktör	Ninf;
gömlek	Ninf;
hamt	Ninf;
akvaryum	Ninf;
pipet	Ninf;
yabancı% anahtar	Ninf;
engizisyon	Ninf;
mal	Ninf;
çar	Ninf;
çoban	Ninf;
akış	Ninf;
peri% masalı	Ninf;
gelen% giden	Ninf;
derleme	Ninf;
şelale	Ninf;
ehemmiyetlilik	Ninf;
bülbül	Ninf;
şampiyon	Ninf;
üyelik	Ninf;
düşey% asimptot	Ninf;
entomoloji	Ninf;
sürüngen	Ninf;
ortam	Ninf;
kantin	Ninf;
karı	Ninf;
ortak	Ninf;
çağanoz	Ninf;
kilise	Ninf;
çalgıcı	Ninf;
sporcu	Ninf;
anjiyografi	Ninf;
burun	Ninf;
ayakkabıcı	Ninf;
köygöçüren	Ninf;
dernek	Ninf;
mobilya	Ninf;
yerküre% bilimci	Ninf;
fonksiyon	Ninf;
veteriner	Ninf;
kot	Ninf;
bıyık	Ninf;
kedi	Ninf;
cumhur	Ninf;
börek	Ninf;
yazma	Ninf;
tütsü	Ninf;
volkanizma	Ninf;
vurgu	Ninf;
alev	Ninf;
heykelcik	Ninf;
sözlükçü	Ninf;
platform	Ninf;
bıyık	Ninf;
kozmonot	Ninf;
telefon	Ninf;
travma	Ninf;
viski	Ninf;
kunduz	Ninf;
paten	Ninf;
sihirbaz	Ninf;
vaha	Ninf;
belirli% integral	Ninf;
vezir	Ninf;
çiş	Ninf;
portakal	Ninf;
artçı% deprem	Ninf;
korkuluk	Ninf;
vitrin	Ninf;
tütsü	Ninf;
boyacı	Ninf;
kamus	Ninf;
ibne	Ninf;
üzüm	Ninf;
aksiseda	Ninf;
pipet	Ninf;
lokum	Ninf;
haham	Ninf;
tekil	Ninf;
bay	Ninf;
sululuk	Ninf;
toz	Ninf;
kefir	Ninf;
tarihçi	Ninf;
sessizlik	Ninf;
yalın% hal	Ninf;
kalfa	Ninf;
demirci	Ninf;
lügatçe	Ninf;
ongunculuk	Ninf;
diş% macunu	Ninf;
haham	Ninf;
yan% cümle	Ninf;
müzikal	Ninf;
maratoncu	Ninf;
örtü	Ninf;
falcı	Ninf;
ölüm	Ninf;
geçmiş	Ninf;
bilye	Ninf;
yonga	Ninf;
kor	Ninf;
yaka	Ninf;
doğu	Ninf;
yumurtalık	Ninf;
iffet	Ninf;
numaralamama	Ninf;
spam	Ninf;
kütük	Ninf;
erkeklik	Ninf;
kıyafet	Ninf;
görüntü	Ninf;
levrek	Ninf;
pembe% dizi	Ninf;
ön% ek	Ninf;
vaftiz	Ninf;
çar	Ninf;
altın	Ninf;
mezra	Ninf;
valiz	Ninf;
kastanyet	Ninf;
çamur	Ninf;
katar	Ninf;
t	Ninf;
raentomoloji	Ninf;
belirtme% hali	Ninf;
onguncu	Ninf;
çakıl	Ninf;
grup	Ninf;
vakit	Ninf;
tepkime	Ninf;
sözcülük	Ninf;
nedime	Ninf;
yarak	Ninf;
aznavur	Ninf;
film	Ninf;
reaktör	Ninf;
pencere	Ninf;
strüktür	Ninf;
melek	Ninf;
koca	Ninf;
açılır% liste	Ninf;
çorap	Ninf;
mezarlık	Ninf;
liste	Ninf;
deoksiribonükleik% asit	Ninf;
balkan	Ninf;
dövüş	Ninf;
ninni	Ninf;
seçiciler% kurulu	Ninf;
evlilik	Ninf;
milyarder	Ninf;
eşantiyon	Ninf;
sevkiyat	Ninf;
oda	Ninf;
bakan	Ninf;
hatır	Ninf;
cezerye	Ninf;
şalvar	Ninf;
yörünge	Ninf;
yuva	Ninf;
şehir	Ninf;
güvercin	Ninf;
varoş	Ninf;
mancınık	Ninf;
gençlik	Ninf;
pipi	Ninf;
evcik	Ninf;
bilişsel% psikoloji	Ninf;
silgi	Ninf;
otuz% birci	Ninf;
oto	Ninf;
bellek	Ninf;
konsey	Ninf;
karamel	Ninf;
yol% arkadaşı	Ninf;
üçüz	Ninf;
deney	Ninf;
köylü	Ninf;
turşu	Ninf;
barış	Ninf;
dadı	Ninf;
erkecel	Ninf;
banka	Ninf;
haber	Ninf;
vekil	Ninf;
onur	Ninf;
bakan	Ninf;
monolog	Ninf;
çağanoz	Ninf;
dolap	Ninf;
dirim	Ninf;
tofobi	Ninf;
amaç	Ninf;
güvenlilik	Ninf;
heteroseksüel	Ninf;
fakir	Ninf;
iskender	Ninf;
evcik	Ninf;
sülüs	Ninf;
birlik	Ninf;
zağar	Ninf;
valiz	Ninf;
balina	Ninf;
bakir	Ninf;
dernek	Ninf;
açılır% liste	Ninf;
jonglör	Ninf;
kapak	Ninf;
cihan	Ninf;
papatya	Ninf;
katar	Ninf;
erime	Ninf;
hükûmet	Ninf;
sunucu	Ninf;
hayalî% arkadaş	Ninf;
müşteri	Ninf;
mümkün% kılma	Ninf;
kısrak	Ninf;
bilye	Ninf;
maskara	Ninf;
zafer	Ninf;
kavim	Ninf;
iribaş	Ninf;
totem	Ninf;
çökelek	Ninf;
karı	Ninf;
karmaşık% sayı	Ninf;
davranış	Ninf;
mermi	Ninf;
desen	Ninf;
salon	Ninf;
helva	Ninf;
ortaklık	Ninf;
hücre	Ninf;
kovboy	Ninf;
kamus	Ninf;
sargı	Ninf;
yağlayıcı	Ninf;
satış	Ninf;
yardımcılık	Ninf;
jaluzi	Ninf;
tarım	Ninf;
dalak	Ninf;
sosisli% sandviç	Ninf;
kaş	Ninf;
nişanlı	Ninf;
ikaz	Ninf;
adale	Ninf;
üvey% kız	Ninf;
batı	Ninf;
çiftlik	Ninf;
ağaç% çivi	Ninf;
anüs	Ninf;
efsun	Ninf;
okul	Ninf;
bulgur	Ninf;
lahana	Ninf;
hastane	Ninf;
forumdaş	Ninf;
mühimlik	Ninf;
saç	Ninf;
karşılık	Ninf;
külfet	Ninf;
dinozor	Ninf;
bohça	Ninf;
omuz	Ninf;
çip	Ninf;
İngiliz% anahtarı	Ninf;
deli	Ninf;
hükûmet	Ninf;
havuç	Ninf;
çıt	Ninf;
taraba	Ninf;
granüllü% endoplazmik% retikulum	Ninf;
Duşanbeli	Ninf;
salçalık	Ninf;
kuvvet	Ninf;
dalak	Ninf;
fikir	Ninf;
yatay% asimptot	Ninf;
strüktür	Ninf;
ofis	Ninf;
kuma	Ninf;
cezerye	Ninf;
palmiye	Ninf;
güllaç	Ninf;
düğün	Ninf;
sindirim	Ninf;
savaşçı	Ninf;
ilişkisel% model	Ninf;
efsun	Ninf;
diyapazon	Ninf;
şalvar	Ninf;
kutu	Ninf;
maratoncu	Ninf;
abacı	Ninf;
ecel	Ninf;
asit	Ninf;
şamdan	Ninf;
çelik	Ninf;
finiş	Ninf;
lahana	Ninf;
çar	Ninf;
sabit% disk	Ninf;
kantin	Ninf;
vefat	Ninf;
Musevi	Ninf;
pancar	Ninf;
yumuşakça	Ninf;
kaçak	Ninf;
marangoz%	Ninf;
heteroseksüel	Ninf;
bit% sineği	Ninf;
kumanda	Ninf;
bitki	Ninf;
kireç	Ninf;
abajur	Ninf;
taç% yaprak	Ninf;
nükleotit	Ninf;
salam	Ninf;
kat	Ninf;
yardımcı	Ninf;
ebe	Ninf;
kipa	Ninf;
ebediyet	Ninf;
yoğurt	Ninf;
yapma	Ninf;
kutu	Ninf;
kümes	Ninf;
genelev	Ninf;
öğrenci	Ninf;
ipek	Ninf;
feribot	Ninf;
parmak	Ninf;
çökerti	Ninf;
gazete	Ninf;
tek% boynuzlu% at	Ninf;
gürz	Ninf;
savaş	Ninf;
erkenek	Ninf;
kümes	Ninf;
alt% kavram	Ninf;
yapma	Ninf;
bamya	Ninf;
karpuz	Ninf;
hapis	Ninf;
patlıcan	Ninf;
şeriat	Ninf;
nedime	Ninf;
çiçe	Ninf;
yer	Ninf;
enjeksiyon	Ninf;
dinleti	Ninf;
işleme	Ninf;
en% küçük% ortak% kat	Ninf;
kaygı	Ninf;
kardeş	Ninf;
gırtlak	Ninf;
kuzgun	Ninf;
supap	Ninf;
koyu% sırtlı% saka	Ninf;
pelin	Ninf;
is	Ninf;
erkecel	Ninf;
susam	Ninf;
eziyetçi	Ninf;
belediye	Ninf;
süs	Ninf;
hatır	Ninf;
aşk	Ninf;
mümessillik	Ninf;
yatay% asimptot	Ninf;
adam	Ninf;
fitil	Ninf;
domates	Ninf;
sempozyum	Ninf;
taciz	Ninf;
intikam	Ninf;
hıçkırık	Ninf;
usul	Ninf;
çakal	Ninf;
adsız% sınıf	Ninf;
ziggurat	Ninf;
ucube	Ninf;
